Maine, session 132, LD203.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5217, as amended by PL 2015, c. 267, Pt. DD, §22, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §5217-G is enacted to read:
§5217-G. Employer-supported child care credit
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Employing unit" has the same meaning as in Title 26, section 1043, subsection 10.
B. "Providing child care services" means expending funds or providing in-kind
resources to build, furnish, license, staff, operate or subsidize a child care center
licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services to provide early care and
education services to children of employees of the employing unit at no profit to the
employing unit or to contract with a child care facility licensed by or registered with
the department to provide early care and education services to children of employees
of the employing unit. "Providing child care services" includes payments made by an
employing unit to an employee for purposes of paying for early care and education
services for children of the employee under a dependent care assistance program and
the provision of child care resource and referral services to employees.
2. Credit allowed for child care expenses. For tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2026, an employing unit is allowed a refundable credit against the tax otherwise due
under this Part for each tax year in an amount equal to the lesser of:
A. Fifty percent of the costs incurred in providing child care services; and
B. Three thousand dollars for each child of an employee of the employing unit for
which the employing unit is providing child care services.
3. Carry-over. Any unused credit under this section may be carried over to the
following year or years for a period not to exceed 15 years.
4. Evaluation; specific public policy objectives. Beginning in 2030, the credit
provided under this section is subject to ongoing legislative review in accordance with Title
3, chapter 37. In developing evaluation parameters to perform the review, the Office of
Program Evaluation and Government Accountability, the joint legislative committee
established to oversee program and government accountability matters and the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over taxation matters shall
consider whether the specific public policy objectives and economic benefit of the credit
provided under this section outweigh the loss of revenue to the State.